New Jersey, session 222, S1797.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1993, c.309 (C.26:1A-36.7) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The Department of Health, in conjunction with the Departments of Education and Human Services, shall establish a Statewide system of early intervention services for eligible infants, [and] toddlers, and young children from birth to age [two] five, inclusive, with physical, cognitive, communication, social[,] or emotional, and adaptive developmental delays or disabilities in accordance with Part [H] C of the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," [Pub.L.91-230 (20 U.S.C. s.1471 et seq.)] Pub.L.108-446 (20 U.S.C. s.1431 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, s.96) 2.  (New section) The Department of Health shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may necessary to secure federal financial participation for State expenditures under Part C of the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," Pub.L.108-446 (20 U.S.C. s.1431 et seq.) as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.